Utah statutes.
4-37-402.   Documentation required to import aquatic animals.
Any aquatic animals classified as controlled species by rules of the Wildlife
Board that are imported into the state for use in aquaculture or fee fishing
facilities shall be accompanied by documentation indicating the following:
(1)  the health approval number assigned by the department to the source
facility;
(2)  common or scientific names of the imported animals;
(3)  name and address of the consignor and consignee;
(4)  origin of shipment;
(5)  final destination;
(6)  number or pounds shipped;
(7)  purpose for which shipped;
(8)  method of transportation; and
(9)  any other information required by the department.
